Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1749.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of Pennsylvania steel products in this Commonwealth. For the purposes of this clause, 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 the term "Pennsylvania steel products" means p roducts rolled, formed, shaped, drawn, extruded, forged, cast, fabricated or otherwise similarly processed, or processed by a combination of two or more of such operations, from steel made in Pennsylvania by the open hearth, basic oxygen, electric furnace, Bessemer or other steel making process. The following shall apply:(i) The term shall include cast iron products made i n Pennsylvania or machinery and equipment listed in United States Department of Commerce Standard Industrial Classification 25 (furniture and fixtures), 35 (industrial and commercial machinery and computer equipment) and 37 (transportation equipment) and made of, fabricated from or containing steel components made in Pennsylvania.(ii) If a product contains Pennsylvania steel and United States steel or foreign steel, the product shall be considered a Pennsylvania steel product under this clause only if at least seventy-five per cent of the cost of the articles, materials and supplies have been mined, produced or manufactured, as the case may be, in Pennsylvania.Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-G.2FUELING OPPORTUNITIES FOR THE REVITALIZATION,GROWTH AND EFFICIENCY OF STEEL TAX CREDITSection 1701-G.2. Scope of article. This article establishes a fueling opportunities for the revitalization, growth and efficiency of steel tax credit. Section 1702-G.2. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250HB1749PN2157 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Company." A corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, business trust, affiliate, unincorporated joint venture or other business entity doing business within this Commonwealth."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth. "Facility improvement." A retrofit, upgrade or operational improvement at a facility located in this Commonwealth for the purpose of manufacturing steel at the facility, including the installation or use of advanced manufacturing technology."Pass-through entity." Any of the following: (1) A partnership as defined in section 301(n.0). (2) A Pennsylvania S corporation as defined in section 301(n.1).(3) An unincorporated entity subject to section 307.21. "Qualified tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Articles III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, XI and XV. The term does not include tax withheld under section 316.1."Qualified taxpayer." A company that satisfies all of the following:(1) Purchases and uses facility improvements to manufacture steel material at a facility located in this Commonwealth.(2) Has made a capital investment of at least $50,000,000 in facility improvements to manufacture steel material at a facility located in this Commonwealth.(3) Has created at least 100 full-time equivalent jobs due to the purchase and use of facility improvements to manufacture steel material at a facility located in this Commonwealth."Tax credit." The fueling opportunities for the 20250HB1749PN2157 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 revitalization, growth and efficiency of steel tax credit established under this article.Section 1703-G.2. Eligibility.In order to be eligible to receive a tax credit, a company shall demonstrate:(1) The company is a qualified taxpayer. (2) Confirmation that the company has filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years and paid any balance of State tax due as determined by assessment or determination by the department and not under timely appeal.Section 1704-G.2. Application and approval of tax credit. (a) Determination of tax credit amount.--(1) The annual tax credit amount may be determined based upon any one or more of the following:(i) A base tax credit equal to no more than 3% of the amount of capital investments in facility improvements.(ii) An additional tax credit equal to no more than 3% of the amount of capital investments in facility improvements involving advanced manufacturing technology that:(A) enable lower-carbon steel production;(B) increase electricity or hydrogen generation capacity; or(C) use recycled steel as a material input.(2) A portion of the additional tax credit under paragraph (1)(ii) may be allocated to workforce development expenditures, including training for employees in advanced or modern steel production practices, not to exceed $2,500 per 20250HB1749PN2157 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 worker.(b) Application.-- (1) A qualified taxpayer may apply to the department for a tax credit under this section.(2) The application must be submitted to the department by March 1 for the tax credit claimed for capital investments in facility improvements by the qualified taxpayer during the prior calendar year. The application must be on the form required by the department.(3) The qualified taxpayer shall include all of the following in the application:(i) A workforce reassignment plan for employees displaced by technology upgrades caused by facility improvements.(ii) An estimate of new jobs created due to facility improvements.(iii) An estimate of existing jobs retained as a result of facility improvements.(4) The department may require information necessary to document the capital investments in facility improvements.(c) Review and approval.-- (1) The department shall review and approve or disapprove the applications by May 1.(2) Upon approval, the department shall issue a certificate stating the amount of tax credit granted for capital investments in facility improvements in the prior calendar year.(3) In awarding tax credits, the department shall give priority to qualified taxpayers that make capital investments in existing facilities in this Commonwealth on or before the 20250HB1749PN2157 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effective date of this paragraph before issuing credits to qualified taxpayers that make capital investments in new or proposed facilities in this Commonwealth after the effective date of this paragraph.(d) Availability of tax credits.-- (1) Each fiscal year, $20,000,000 in tax credits shall be made available to the department in accordance with this article.(2) The department shall issue up to $20,000,000 in tax credits in a fiscal year to the qualified taxpayers which meet the qualifications to receive a tax credit under this article.(3) The total aggregate amount of tax credits awarded to a qualified taxpayer under this article may not exceed 30% of the amount of capital investments in facility improvements.Section 1705-G.2. Use of tax credits. (a) Initial use.--Prior to sale or assignment of a tax credit under section 1708-G.2, a qualified taxpayer must first use a tax credit against the qualified tax liability incurred in the taxable year for which the tax credit was approved.(b) Eligibility.--The tax credit may be applied against up to 20% of the qualified taxpayer's qualified tax liabilities incurred in the taxable year for which the tax credit was approved.(c) Limit.--A qualified taxpayer that has been granted a tax credit under this article shall be ineligible for any other tax credit provided under this act or a tax benefit as defined in section 1701-A.1.Section 1706-G.2. Employment protections.(a) Employment requirements.--A qualified taxpayer receiving 20250HB1749PN2157 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the tax credit shall certify to the department that the qualified taxpayer hires or maintains an increased or equivalent amount of employees for the five-year period after receipt of the tax credit.(b) Training program.--A qualified taxpayer receiving the tax credit shall implement a workforce development training program within one year of receipt of the tax credit in accordance with guidelines developed by the department.Section 1707-G.2. Carryover, carryback and refund. A tax credit may not be carried back, carried forward or used to obtain a refund.Section 1708-G.2. Sale or assignment. (a) Authorization.--If a qualified taxpayer holds a tax credit through the end of the calendar year in which the tax credit was granted, the qualified taxpayer may sell or assign a tax credit, in whole or in part, provided the sale is effective by the close of the following calendar year.(b) Application.-- (1) To sell or assign a tax credit, a qualified taxpayer must file an application for the sale or assignment of the tax credit with the department. The application must be on a form required by the department.(2) To approve an application, the department must receive a finding from the department that the applicant has:(i) filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years; and(ii) paid any balance of State tax due as determined by assessment or determination by the department and not under timely appeal.(c) Approval.--Upon approval by the department , a qualified 20250HB1749PN2157 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 taxpayer may sell or assign, in whole or in part, a tax credit.Section 1709-G.2. Purchasers and assignees. (a) Time.--The purchaser or assignee under section 1708-G.2 must claim the tax credit in the calendar year in which the purchase or assignment is made.(b) Amount.--The amount of the tax credit that a purchaser or assignee under section 1708-G.2 may use against any one qualified tax liability may not exceed 50% of any of the qualified tax liabilities for the taxable year.(c) Resale and reassignment.-- (1) A purchaser under section 1708-G.2 may not sell or assign the purchased tax credit.(2) An assignee under section 1708-G.2 may not sell or assign the assigned tax credit.(d) Notice.--The purchaser or assignee under section 1708- G.2 shall notify the department of the seller or assignor of the tax credit in compliance with procedures specified by the department.Section 17010-G.2. Pass-through entity. (a) Election.--If a pass-through entity has an unused tax credit, it may elect in writing, according to procedures established by the department, to transfer all or a portion of the credit to shareholders, members or partners in proportion to the share of the entity's distributive income to which the shareholders, members or partners are entitled.(b) Limitation.--The same unused tax credit under subsection (a) may not be claimed by:(1) the pass-through entity; and (2) a shareholder, member or partner of the pass-through entity.20250HB1749PN2157 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Amount.--The amount of the tax credit that a transferee under subsection (a) may use against any one qualified tax liability may not exceed 20% of any qualified tax liabilities for the taxable year.(d) Time.--A transferee under subsection (a) must claim the tax credit in the calendar year in which the transfer is made.(e) Sale and assignment.--A transferee under subsection (a) may not sell or assign the tax credit.Section 1711-G.2. Administration. (a) Audits and assessments.--The department shall: (1) Audit a qualified taxpayer claiming a tax credit to ascertain the validity of the amount claimed.(2) Issue an assessment against a qualified taxpayer for an improperly issued tax credit. The procedures, collection, enforcement and appeals of any assessment made under this section shall be governed by Article II.(b) Recapture.--(1) The department may recapture all or part of the tax credit if a recipient fails to meet the job retention or creation requirements under this article.(2) A recipient of the tax credit that relocates operations outside of this Commonwealth within five years after receiving the credit shall repay the full amount of the tax credit received to the department. The department may waive the repayment requirement under this paragraph if a recipient of the tax credit demonstrates substantial hardship or public benefit to the department.(c) Guidelines and regulations.--The department shall develop written guidelines for the implementation of this article. The guidelines shall be in effect until the department 20250HB1749PN2157 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 promulgates regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this article.Section 1712-G.2. Reports to General Assembly. By September 1, 2026, and September 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report on the tax credit provided by this article to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include all of the following:(1) The names of the qualified taxpayers utilizing the tax credit as of the date of the report and the amount of tax credits approved for, utilized by or sold or assigned by a qualified taxpayer.( 2) Data on the benefits provided to this Commonwealth regarding the quantity of steel material produced and used as a result of the tax credit.Section 1713-G.2. Applicability. The tax credit under this article shall apply to capital investments in each facility improvement for a period of five years from the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall apply as follows:(1) The addition of section 204(77) of the act shall apply to sales at retail or use after December 31, 2026.(2) The addition of Article XVII-G.2 of the act shall apply for tax years commencing after December 31, 2026.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1749PN2157 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930